California statutes. Public Resources Code
(B) Improve the management of fisheries through grants or loans for the development and implementation of fishery management plans pursuant to Part 1.7 (commencing with Section 7050) of Division 6 of the Fish and Game Code, a part of the Marine Life Management Act of 1998, that promote long-term stewardship and collaboration with fishery participants to develop strategies that increase environmental and economic sustainability. Eligible projects and activities include, but are not limited to, innovative community-based or cooperative management and allocation strategies that create incentives for ecosystem improvement. Eligible expenditures include, but are not limited to, costs related to activities identified in subdivisions (a), (b), and (d)
 of Section 7075 of the Fish and Game Code, fishery research, monitoring, data collection and analysis to support adaptive management, and other costs related to the development and implementation of a fishery management plan developed pursuant to this subparagraph.

(C) Foster sustainable fisheries, including grants or loans for one or more of the following:

(i) Projects that encourage the development and use of more selective fishing gear.

(ii) The design of community-based or cooperative management mechanisms that promote long-term stewardship and collaboration with fishery participants to develop strategies that increase environmental and economic sustainability.

(iii) Collaborative research and demonstration projects between fishery participants, scientists, and other interested parties.

(iv) Promotion of value-added wild fisheries to offset economic losses attributable to reduced fishing opportunities.

(v) The creation of revolving loan programs for the purpose of implementing sustainable fishery projects.

(D) Improve coastal water quality.

(E) Allow for increased public access to, and enjoyment of, ocean and coastal resources, consistent with sustainable, long-term protection and conservation of those resources.

(F) Improve management, conservation, and
 protection of coastal waters and ocean ecosystems.

(G) Provide monitoring and scientific data to improve state efforts to protect and conserve ocean resources.

(H) Protect, conserve, and restore coastal waters and ocean ecosystems, including any of the following:

(i) Acquisition, installation, and initiation of monitoring and enforcement systems.

(ii) Acquisition from willing sellers of vessels, equipment, licenses, harvest rights, permits, and other rights and property, to reduce threats to ocean ecosystems and resources.

(I) Address coastal water contamination from biological pathogens,
 including collaborative projects and activities to identify the sources of pathogens and develop detection systems and treatment methods.

(J) (i) Provide funding for adaptive management, planning, coordination, monitoring, research, and other necessary activities to minimize the adverse impacts of climate change on California’s ocean ecosystem, including, but not limited to, the effects of sea level rise, changes in ocean productivity, and ocean acidification on coastal and ocean habitat, wildlife, fisheries, chemistry, and other key attributes of ocean ecosystems and to increase the state’s understanding of the ocean’s role in carbon sequestration. Adaptive management strategies, planning, research, monitoring, or other activities shall be designed to improve the management of coastal and ocean resources or aid the
 state to adapt to climate change impacts.

(ii) Information or activities developed under clause (i), to the extent appropriate, shall provide guidance to the State Air Resources Board for the adoption of early action measures for the elimination or reduction of emissions from sources or categories of sources pursuant to the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code).

(c) Grants or loans may be made to a private entity pursuant to this section only for projects or activities that further public purposes consistent with Sections 35510, 35515, 35617, and
 35632.

(d) Consistent with the purposes specified in Section 35515, and in furtherance of the findings in Sections 7059 and 7060 of the Fish and Game Code, the council, in authorizing grants or loans for projects or expenditures pursuant to this section, shall promote coordination of state programs and activities that protect and conserve ocean resources to avoid redundancy and conflicts to ensure that the state’s programs and activities are complementary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 846, Sec. 2.   (SB 1363)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

35651.

The council shall use one million dollars ($1,000,000) of the amount appropriated to it in Item 0540-101-0001 of Section 2.0 of the Budget Act of 2018 (Chapter 29 of the Statutes of 2018) for whale and sea turtle entanglement to fund the transition program established pursuant to Section 8583 of the Fish and Game Code. The council shall enter into an agreement with the fiscal agent described in Section 8583 of the Fish and Game Code to provide funds to the fiscal agent for permittees who participate in the transition program. If the amount described in this section is not necessary due to the number of participants who have indicated an intention to participate in the transition program pursuant to Section 8583 of the Fish and Game Code, the council may redirect the remaining funds to other purposes related to whale and sea turtle
 entanglement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 228.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 27. OCEAN RESOURCES MANAGEMENT [36000. - 36995.]



CHAPTER 1. Findings and Declarations [36000. - 36003.]

36000.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the California Ocean Resources Management Act of 1990 (CORMA).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1637, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

36001.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The Pacific Ocean and its many renewable and nonrenewable resources are of economic, environmental, aesthetic, recreational, military, and scientific importance to the people of the state and the nation.

(b) Humankind will benefit from ocean resources as technology continues to develop. Our ability to protect, preserve, coordinate, develop, and utilize these resources requires that we do so in an informed and balanced manner.

(c) On March 10, 1983, President Reagan established by proclamation an exclusive economic zone for the United States, declaring sovereign rights over living and nonliving resources within the 200-mile United States exclusive economic zone (EEZ).

(d) On December 27, 1988, President Reagan extended by proclamation the seaward limit of United States territorial waters from 3 to 12 nautical miles.

(e) The establishment of the exclusive economic zone and the extension of the Territorial Sea create zones under federal jurisdiction adjacent to state waters, and provide opportunity for all coastal states of the United States to more fully exercise and assert their responsibilities pertaining to the protection, conservation, and development of ocean resources under United States jurisdiction. 

(f) Exploration, scientific research, development, and production of ocean resources resulting from differing jurisdictions and multiple programs in federal and state waters, will increase the chance of conflicting demands on ocean resources and uses, such as those for food, energy, minerals, and waste disposal.

(g) Resolution of conflicting interests in the use, development, and conservation of ocean resources will become one of the major policy issues facing the state. The problems which will emerge in the future due to interactions of competing users are already prevalent to some degree today.

(h) State agencies do have particular regulatory or program interests in protecting and managing resources and uses in state waters and for coordinating state interests in the territorial sea and the EEZ, but the state needs to formulate a framework of statewide objectives for management of ocean resources and their uses, and outline a clear statement of functional responsibility for state ocean resources management.

(i) The exclusive economic zone, the territorial sea, state waters, and terrestrial environments are an interdependent system that has to be managed through a cooperative effort between appropriate federal, state, and local agencies. The fluid, dynamic nature of the ocean and the migration of many of its living resources beyond state and federal boundaries extend the ocean management interests of this state beyond the three-nautical-mile limit currently managed by the state pursuant to the federal Submerged Lands Act (43 U.S.C. Sec. 1301 et seq.).

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1215, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

36002.

The Legislature further finds and declares all of the following:

(a) It is the policy of the State of California to do the following:

(1) Assess the long-term values and benefits of the conservation and development of ocean resources and uses with the objective of restoring or maintaining the health of the ocean ecosystem and ensuring the proper management of renewable and nonrenewable resources.

(2) Encourage ocean resources development which is environmentally sound, sustainable, and economically beneficial.

(3) Provide for efficient and coordinated resources management in state and federal waters.

(4) Assert the interests of this state in cooperation with federal agencies in the sound management of ocean resources.

(5) Promote research, study, and understanding of ocean processes and resources to acquire the scientific information necessary to understand the ocean ecosystem and life-support systems and the relationships of ocean development activities and associated impacts on ocean and coastal resources of the state and adjacent zones of federal jurisdiction.

(6) Encourage research and development of innovative, environmentally compatible marine technologies for protection, exploration, and utilization of ocean resources.

(b) It is further the policy of the State of California to develop and maintain an ocean resources planning and management program to promote and ensure coordinated management of federal resources and uses with those in state waters, and with adjacent states, to ensure effective participation in federal planning and management of ocean resources and uses which may affect this state, and to coordinate state agency management of ocean resources with local government management of coastal zone uses and resources above the mean high tide line.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1215, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

36003.

(a) No authority is created under this division, nor shall any of its purposes or provisions be used by any public or private agency or person, to delay or deny any existing or future project or activity during the preparation and delivery of the report and plan required by this division. 

(b) No authority is created under this division to supersede current state agency statutory authority. 

(c) The task force established pursuant to Section 36300 shall cease to exist upon delivery of its report and plan to the Governor and the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1027, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Definitions [36100. - 36110.]

36100.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this chapter govern the interpretation of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1215, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

36101.

“Advisory committee” means the California Ocean Resources Advisory Committee established pursuant to Section 36302.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1215, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

36102.

“Exclusive economic zone (EEZ)” means the zone as measured from the mean high tide line seaward to 200 nautical miles as set forth in the Presidential Proclamation 5030 of March 10, 1983, in which the United States proclaimed jurisdiction over the resources of the ocean within 200 miles of the coastline.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1215, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

36103.

“High Seas” means offshore waters beyond 200 nautical miles from the coastline.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1215, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

36104.

“Program” means the California Ocean Resources Management Program established by Section 36200.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1215, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

36105.

“Ocean” and “marine” mean those waters from the coastline into the high seas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1215, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

36106.

“Ocean resources” means all living and nonliving resources found in the Pacific Ocean and its contiguous saline or brackish bays and estuaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1215, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

36107.

“Report and plan” means the report and plan prepared by the task force.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1027, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

36108.

“State waters” means the zone as measured from the mean high tide line to three nautical miles offshore, as set forth by the Submerged Lands Act (43 U.S.C. Sec. 1311) in which the United States released to adjacent coastal states title, ownership, and the right to manage natural resources from the mean high tide line seaward to three miles.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1215, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

36109.

“Task force” means the Ocean Resources Task Force created by Section 36300.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1215, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

36110.

“Territorial sea” means the zone as measured from mean high tide line to 12 nautical miles offshore as set forth in the Presidential Proclamation on December 27, 1988, in which the United States extended its sovereignty and jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1215, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. California Ocean Resources Management Program [36200. - 36202.]

36200.

To ensure the conservation and development of ocean resources consistent with purposes of this division, a coordinated program of ocean resources planning and management is established.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1215, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

36201.

The California Ocean Resources Management Program consists of all of the following:

(a) The Ocean Resources Task Force. 

(b) The California Ocean Resources Advisory Committee. 

(c) The report and plan prepared and adopted pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 36500).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1027, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

36202.

(a) The State of California is hereby authorized to participate with the States of Alaska, Hawaii, Oregon, and Washington in a joint liaison program with the Center for Ocean Analysis and Prediction of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, with the objective of assisting the states in taking maximum advantage of the oceanographic data, products, and services available from the federal government through the Center for Ocean Analysis and Prediction.

(b) The liaison program shall include all of the following:

(1) Assist state and local governments to become fully aware of oceanographic data and products available from the federal government and especially from the Center for Ocean Analysis and Prediction.

(2) Assist the Center for Ocean Analysis and Prediction and the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration to become more fully aware of state and local problems and the requirements of state and local governments.

(3) Assist in setting up lines of communications to move oceanographic data and products from the Center for Ocean Analysis and Prediction to the people in the states who need those data and products.

(c) The liaison program shall include workshops for small groups of technical experts from state and local governments, academic institutions, and the private sector. The workshops shall be held at the Center for Ocean Analysis and Prediction in Monterey and at other facilities in the western states as appropriate. 

(d) This section shall not become operative until at least one other state participates in the joint liaison program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1637, Sec. 2.   Section conditionally operative by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Creation and Membership of the Task Force [36300. - 36302.]

36300.

The Ocean Resources Task Force is hereby created in state government. The task force is composed of the following or their designee: the Secretary for Environmental Protection, the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, the State Public Health Officer, the Secretary of Transportation, the Chairperson or Executive Officer of the State Lands Commission as determined by the commission, the Chairperson or Executive Director of the California Coastal Commission as determined by the commission, the Chairperson or Executive Officer of the Coastal Conservancy as determined by the conservancy, the Chairperson or Executive Director of the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission as determined by the commission,
 the Director of Conservation, the Director of Fish and Game, the Director of Parks and Recreation, the Office of Mine Reclamation, the Chairperson or Executive Director of the State Water Resources Control Board as determined by the board, the executive officer of each California regional water quality control board for a coastal region, the Director of Finance, the Chairperson or Executive Director of the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission as determined by the commission, the Chairperson of the State Air Resources Board, the Chairperson of the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Water, the Chairperson of the Assembly Committee on Natural Resources, the President of the University of California, the Chancellor of the California State University, and the Director of the California Sea Grant program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 489.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

36301.

The chairperson of the task force shall be the Secretary of the Resources Agency, who shall provide all staff support required by the task force. The task force shall meet at the call of the chairperson.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1027, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

36302.

The chairperson of the task force, with advice from the task force, shall appoint the California Ocean Resources Advisory Committee, which, at a minimum, shall consist of the following: representatives of coastal local governments, relevant federal agencies, environmental and interest groups, the Legislature, and relevant industries such as oil and gas, hard minerals, biotechnology, commercial and sportfishing, seafood processing, aquaculture, transportation, tourism, and ports and harbors.

The advisory committee shall review the draft of the report and plan of the task force and shall advise the task force in its preparation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1027, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Responsibilities and Duties of the Task Force [36400. - 36402.]

36400.

The task force shall prepare a report and plan as required by Section 36500.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1027, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

36401.

The chairperson of the task force shall submit the report and plan to the Governor and the Legislature as specified in Section 36500.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1027, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

36402.

The task force shall provide opportunity for public review and comment following release of a draft scoping document and also following release of a draft report and plan. Public comments shall be submitted with the report and plan to the Governor and the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1027, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Preparation of Ocean Resources Report and Recommendations [36500. - 36500.]

36500.

The task force shall prepare a report regarding existing ocean resources management activities and impacts, including a plan to increase coordination and consolidation of these activities. The report and plan shall be submitted to the Governor and the Legislature by July 1, 1994. The report and plan shall include, to the degree information is available, at least all of the following:

(a) Inventory of state and federal laws, rules and regulations, authorities, and programs which pertain to the resources and uses of state and federal waters. 

(b) Analysis of state laws, rules and regulations, authorities, and programs which pertain to the resources and uses of state and federal waters, and which conflict with one another or with federal laws, rules and regulations, authorities, and programs. 

(c) Identification of existing and potential resources and uses of, and issues pertaining to, the ocean, and of potential new industries and jobs related to development of ocean resources and uses.

(d) Identification of potential impacts to federal and state waters and to coastal areas above the mean high tide line from activities in federal and state waters, and an evaluation of state agency ability to manage those impacts. 

(e) Identification of all existing state and federal programs relating to federal and state waters pollution research and monitoring, including general research on the marine ecosystem. 

(f) Evaluation of the feasibility of developing computerized mapping of existing conditions, uses, and resources in federal and state waters. 

(g) A long-term plan for conservation and protection of ocean resources and uses. 

(h) A long-term plan for the management of California’s interests in federal waters, including recommendations to develop or improve state agency programs relating to the management of EEZ resources and uses, and the identification of issues which may affect local government local coastal programs. 

(i) A plan for the continuation and improvement of the role of the state as a leader in education, research, and training in marine sciences and the management of marine resources, including recommendations for state-supported marine research in state and federal waters. 

(j) A plan for cooperation by the state with other states, the federal government, other nations, and national and international organizations in marine science activities when that cooperation is in the interest of the State of California. 

(k) A plan for options for ensuring appropriate public infrastructure investment to support present and future ocean industries. 

(l) Prioritization of resource and use conflicts in federal and state waters. 

(m) Identification of alternative dispute management and resolution processes for resource conflicts in and between federal and state jurisdictions, and a proposed framework for managing future conflicts. 

(n) A plan for joint federal and state management activities and revenue sharing in state and federal waters. 

(o) Recommendations for proposed implementing legislation, if any.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 791, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Marine Managed Areas Improvement Act [36600. - 36900.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [36600. - 36620.]

36600.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Marine Managed Areas Improvement Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 385, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

36601.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) California’s extraordinary ocean and coastal resources provide a vital asset to the state and nation. These resources are important to public health and well-being, ecological health, and ocean-dependent industries.

(2) The ocean ecosystem is inextricably connected to the land, with coastal development, water pollution, and other human activities threatening the health of marine habitat and the biological diversity found in California’s ocean waters. New technologies and demands have encouraged the expansion of fishing and other activities to formerly inaccessible marine areas that once recharged nearby fisheries. As a result, ecosystems throughout the state’s ocean waters are being altered, often at a rapid rate.

(3) California’s marine managed areas (MMAs), such as refuges, reserves, and state reserves, are one of many tools for resource managers to use for protecting, conserving, and managing the state’s valuable marine resources. MMAs can offer many benefits, including protecting habitats, species, cultural resources, and water quality; enhancing recreational opportunities; and contributing to the economy through such things as increased tourism and property values. MMAs may also benefit fisheries management by protecting representative habitats and reducing extractive uses.

(4) The array of state MMAs in California is the result of over 50 years of designations through legislative, administrative, and statewide ballot initiative actions, which has led to 18 classifications and subclassifications of these areas.

(5) A State Interagency Marine Managed Areas Workgroup was convened by the Resources Agency to address this issue, bringing together for the first time all of the state agencies with jurisdiction over these areas. This group’s report indicates that California’s state MMAs have evolved on a case-by-case basis, without conforming to any plan for establishing MMAs in the most effective way or in a manner which ensures that the most representative or unique areas of the ocean and coastal environment are included.

(6) The report further states that California’s MMAs do not comprise an organized system, as the individual sites are not designated, classified, or managed in a systematic manner. Many of these areas lack clearly defined purposes, effective management measures, and enforcement.

(7) To some, this array of MMAs creates the illusion of a comprehensive system of management, while in reality, it falls short of its potential to protect, conserve, and manage natural, cultural, and recreational resources along the California coast. Without a properly designed and coordinated system of MMAs, it is difficult for agencies to meet management objectives, such as maintaining biodiversity, providing education and outreach, and protecting marine resources.

(8) Agency personnel and the public are often confused about the laws, rules, and regulations that apply to MMAs, especially those adjacent to a terrestrial area set aside for management purposes. Lack of clarity about the manner in which the set of laws, rules, and regulations for the array of MMAs interface and complement each other limits public and resource managers’ ability to understand and apply the regulatory structure.

(9) Designation of sites and subsequent adoption of regulations often occur without adequate consideration being given to overall classification goals and objectives. This has contributed to fragmented management, poor compliance with regulations, and a lack of effective enforcement.

(10) Education and outreach related to state MMAs is limited and responsibility for these activities is distributed across many state agencies. These factors hamper the distribution of information to the public regarding the benefits of MMAs and the role they can play in protecting ocean and coastal resources.

(11) There are few coordinated efforts to identify opportunities for public/private partnerships or public stewardship of MMAs or to provide access to general information and data about ocean and coastal resources within California’s MMAs.

(12) Ocean and coastal scientists and managers generally know far less about the natural systems they work with than their terrestrial counterparts. Understanding natural and human-induced factors that affect ocean ecosystem health, including MMAs, is fundamental to the process of developing sound management policies.

(13) Research in California’s MMAs can provide managers with a wealth of knowledge regarding habitat functions and values, species diversity, and complex physical, biological, chemical, and socioeconomic processes that affect the health of marine ecosystems. That information can be useful in determining the effectiveness of particular sites or classifications in achieving stated goals.

(b) With the single exception of state estuaries, it is the intent of the Legislature that the classifications currently available for use in the marine and estuarine environments of the state shall cease to be used and that a new classification system shall be established, with a mission, statement of objectives, clearly defined designation guidelines, specific classification goals, and a more scientifically-based process for designating sites and determining their effectiveness. The existing classifications may continue to be used for the terrestrial and freshwater environments of the state.

(c) Due to the interrelationship between land and sea, benefits can be gained from siting a portion of the state’s marine managed areas adjacent to, or in close proximity to, terrestrial protected areas. To maximize the benefits that can be gained from having connected protected areas, whenever an MMA is adjacent to a terrestrial protected area, the managing agencies shall coordinate their activities to the greatest extent possible to achieve the objectives of both areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 385, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

36602.

The following definitions govern the construction of this chapter:

(a) “Committee” is the State Interagency Coordinating Committee established pursuant to Section 36800.

(b) “Designating entity” is the Fish and Game Commission, State Park and Recreation Commission, or State Water Resources Control Board, each of which has the authority to designate specified state marine managed areas.

(c) “Managing agency” is the Department of Fish and Game or the Department of Parks and Recreation, each of which has the authority to manage specified state marine managed areas.

(d) “Marine managed area” (MMA) is a named, discrete geographic marine or estuarine area along the California coast designated by law or administrative action, and intended to protect, conserve, or otherwise manage a variety of resources and their uses. The resources and uses may include, but are not limited to, living marine resources and their habitats, scenic views, water quality, recreational values, and cultural or geological resources. General areas that are administratively established for recreational or commercial fishing restrictions, such as seasonal or geographic closures or size limits, are not included in this definition. MMAs include the following classifications:

(1) State marine reserve, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 36700.

(2) State marine park, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 36700.

(3) State marine conservation area, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 36700.

(4) State marine cultural preservation area, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 36700.

(5) State marine recreational management area, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 36700.

(6) State water quality protection areas, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 36700.

(e) “Marine protected area” (MPA), consistent with the Marine Life Protection Act (Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 2850) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code) is a named, discrete geographic marine or estuarine area seaward of the mean high tide line or the mouth of a coastal river, including any area of intertidal or subtidal terrain, together with its overlying water and associated flora and fauna that has been designated by law or administrative action to protect or conserve marine life and habitat. MPAs are primarily intended to protect or conserve marine life and habitat, and are therefore a subset of marine managed areas (MMAs). MPAs include the following classifications:

(1) State marine reserve, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 36700.

(2) State marine park, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 36700.

(3) State marine conservation area, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 36700.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 610, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

36620.

The mission of the state MMA system is to ensure the long-term ecological viability and biological productivity of marine and estuarine ecosystems and to preserve cultural resources in the coastal sea, in recognition of their intrinsic value and for the benefit of current and future generations. In support of this mission, the Legislature finds and declares that there is a need to reexamine and redesign California’s array of MMAs, to establish and manage a system using science and clear public policy directives to achieve all of the following objectives:

(a) Conserve representative or outstanding examples of marine and estuarine habitats, biodiversity, ecosystems, and significant natural and cultural features or sites.

(b) Support and promote marine and estuarine research, education, and science-based management.

(c) Help ensure sustainable uses of marine and estuarine resources.

(d) Provide and enhance opportunities for public enjoyment of natural and cultural marine and estuarine resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 610, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Classifications, Designations, Restrictions, and Allowable Uses  [36700. - 36900.]

36700.

Six classifications for designating managed areas in the marine and estuarine environments are hereby established as described in this section, to become effective January 1, 2002. Where the term “marine” is used, it refers to both marine and estuarine areas. A geographic area may be designated under more than one classification.

(a) A “state marine reserve” is a nonterrestrial marine or estuarine area that is designated so the managing agency may achieve one or more of the following:

(1) Protect or restore rare, threatened, or endangered native plants, animals, or habitats in marine areas.

(2) Protect or restore outstanding, representative, or imperiled marine species, communities, habitats, and ecosystems.

(3) Protect or restore diverse marine gene pools.

(4) Contribute to the understanding and management of marine resources and ecosystems by providing the opportunity for scientific research in outstanding, representative, or imperiled marine habitats or ecosystems.

(b) A “state marine park” is a nonterrestrial marine or estuarine area that is designated so the managing agency may provide opportunities for spiritual, scientific, educational, and recreational opportunities, as well as one or more of the following:

(1) Protect or restore outstanding, representative, or imperiled marine species, communities, habitats, and ecosystems.

(2) Contribute to the understanding and management of marine resources and ecosystems by providing the opportunity for scientific research in outstanding representative or imperiled marine habitats or ecosystems.

(3) Preserve cultural objects of historical, archaeological, and scientific interest in marine areas.

(4) Preserve outstanding or unique geological features.

(c) A “state marine conservation area” is a nonterrestrial marine or estuarine area that is designated so the managing agency may achieve one or more of the following:

(1) Protect or restore rare, threatened, or endangered native plants, animals, or habitats in marine areas.

(2) Protect or restore outstanding, representative, or imperiled marine species, communities, habitats, and ecosystems.

(3) Protect or restore diverse marine gene pools.

(4) Contribute to the understanding and management of marine resources and ecosystems by providing the opportunity for scientific research in outstanding, representative, or imperiled marine habitats or ecosystems.

(5) Preserve outstanding or unique geological features.

(6) Provide for sustainable living marine resource harvest.

(d) A “state marine cultural preservation area” is a nonterrestrial marine or estuarine area designated so the managing agency may preserve cultural objects or sites of historical, archaeological, or scientific interest in marine areas.

(e) A “state marine recreational management area” is a nonterrestrial marine or estuarine area designated so the managing agency may provide, limit, or restrict recreational opportunities to meet other than exclusively local needs while preserving basic resource values for present and future generations.

(f) A “state water quality protection area” is a nonterrestrial marine or estuarine area designated to protect marine species or biological communities from an undesirable alteration in natural water quality, including, but not limited to, areas of special biological significance that have been designated by the State Water Resources Control Board through its water quality control planning process. “Areas of special biological significance” are a subset of state water quality protection areas, and require special protection as determined by the State Water Resources Control Board pursuant to the California Ocean Plan adopted and reviewed pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 13160) of Chapter 3 of Division 7 of the Water Code and pursuant to the Water Quality Control Plan for Control of Temperature in the Coastal and Interstate Waters and Enclosed Bays and Estuaries of California (California Thermal Plan) adopted by the state board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 854, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

36710.

(a) In a state marine reserve, it is unlawful to injure, damage, take, or possess any living geological, or cultural marine resource, except under a permit or specific authorization from the managing agency for research, restoration, or monitoring purposes. While, to the extent feasible, the area shall be open to the public for managed enjoyment and study, the area shall be maintained to the extent practicable in an undisturbed and unpolluted state. Access and use for activities including, but not limited to, walking, swimming, boating, and diving may be restricted to protect marine resources. Research, restoration, and monitoring may be permitted by the managing agency. Educational activities and other forms of nonconsumptive human use may be permitted by the designating entity or
 managing agency in a manner consistent with the protection of all marine resources.
